North Dakota statutes. TITLE 29 Judicial Procedure, Criminal
CHAPTER 29-14 Motions and Pleas [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Criminal Procedure]

29-14-01.
Motion to quash — Plea. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 11, 12.

29-14-02.
Refusal to plead or pleading evasively — Failure of corporation to appear. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-03.
Certain pleas abolished — Motion to quash substituted. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-04.
Grounds for motion to quash. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-05.
Motion — Form — Contents. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-06.
Contents of motion to quash when based on pardon. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-07.
When motion to quash heard. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-08.
Trial of issues arising on a motion to quash. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-09.
Motion denied — Answer immediately. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-10.
Entry of order upon motion to quash — Failure. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-11.
Effect of sustaining the motion to quash. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-12.
Failure to move to quash — Effect — Exception. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-13.
Order setting aside, not a bar. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-14.
Defendant’s pleading — Plea. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 11, 12.

29-14-15.
Pleas classified. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 11, 12.

29-14-16.
Offenses to which defendant may plead guilty. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-17.
Plea of guilty to lesser offense or lesser degree. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-18.
Plea of guilty — Determination of punishment. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-19.
Plea to be oral — Form of plea. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 11, 58.

29-14-20.
Plea must be made in open court — Time. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-21.
Plea of guilty put in only by defendant — Exception. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 11, 43.

29-14-22.
Plea of guilty may be withdrawn. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rules 11, 32.

29-14-23.
Plea of not guilty puts in issue every material allegation. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-24.
Evidence under plea. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-25.
Acquittal — Further prosecution. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.

29-14-26.
Acquittal on merits. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-27.
Former acquittal or conviction — Once in jeopardy. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 11.

29-14-28.
Defendant in criminal case to give notice of alibi. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Crim.P., Rule 12.1.